Hawaii statutes.
§249-2 Imposition of tax. Except as
otherwise provided in sections 249-1 to 249-13, and except in the case of
antique motor vehicles which shall be subject to an annual tax of $10 in lieu
of the annual tax otherwise imposed by this section, all vehicles and motor
vehicles as defined in section 249-1, shall be subject to an annual tax,
computed, except for the minimum tax provided for in section 249-13 according
to the net weight of each vehicle at a rate determined as hereinafter provided
in section 249-13. The tax shall be paid by the owner of each vehicle in the
county in which the vehicle is located at the time of registration, whether the
original registration or any subsequent registration, and shall be collected by
the director of finance of such county; provided that if a vehicle is
transported to another county after the payment of the tax, no additional tax
shall be imposed on the vehicle for the remaining period of the year for which the
tax has been paid. [RL 1935, pt of §2157; am L 1937, c 214, §1; RL 1945, §5705;
am L 1951, c 162, §1; RL 1955, §130-2; am L 1963, c 97, §2; am L 1965, c 266,
§1; am L 1966, c 49, §2; am L 1967, c 137, §2; HRS §249-2; am L 2010, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next